Utah statutes.
20A-11-512.   County political party -- Criminal penalties -- Fines.

(1) (a)  A county political party that fails to file an interim report that is due seven days before the county political party's convention is subject to a fine imposed in accordance with Section 20A-11-1005.

(b)  A county political party that fails to file the interim report due before the regular primary election, on August 31, or before the regular general election is subject to a fine of $1,000, which the chief election officer shall deposit in the General Fund.

(2)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of the January 10 statement required by Section 20A-11-510, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed statement to ensure that:

(a)  a county political party officer who is required to file a statement has filed one; and

(b)  each statement contains the information required by Section 20A-11-510.

(3)  If it appears that any county political party officer has failed to file a financial statement, if it appears that a filed financial statement does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any financial statement, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the county political party officer of the violation or written complaint and direct the county political party officer to file a financial statement correcting the problem.

(4)  A county political party that fails to file or amend a financial statement within seven days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section is subject to a fine of $1,000, which the chief election officer shall deposit in the General Fund.



Amended by Chapter 252, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 420, 2013 General Session

